Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 3
VACATION PROCEEDINGS: ROADS, STREETS, AND HIGHWAYS

Cross references:

For abandonment of town incorporation, see part 2 of article 3 of title 31.

43-2-301. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Block" means that portion of a subdivision surrounded by streets, however designated, or other boundary lines and platted as a block, plot, tract, square, or other designated unit.

"Owner" or "owner of record" includes any person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation.

"Roadway" includes any platted or designated public street, alley, lane, parkway, avenue, road, or other public way, whether or not it has been used as such.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 620, § 1.

CSA:

C. 143, § 69(1).

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-14-1.

43-2-302. Vesting of title upon vacation.

Subject to the requirements set forth in sections 43-1-210 (5) and 43-2-106 governing the disposition of certain property by the department of transportation, whenever any roadway has been designated on the plat of any tract of land or has been conveyed to or acquired by a county or incorporated town or city or by the state or by any of its political subdivisions for use as a roadway, and thereafter is vacated, title to the lands included within such roadway or so much thereof as may be vacated shall vest, subject to the same encumbrances, liens, limitations, restrictions, and estates as the land to which it accrues, as follows:

In the event that a roadway which constitutes the exterior boundary of a subdivision or other tract of land is vacated, title to said roadway shall vest in the owners of the land abutting the vacated roadway to the same extent that the land included within the roadway, at the time the roadway was acquired for public use, was a part of the subdivided land or was a part of the adjacent land.

In the event that less than the entire width of a roadway is vacated, title to the vacated portion shall vest in the owners of the land abutting such vacated portion.

In the event that a roadway bounded by straight lines is vacated, title to the vacated roadway shall vest in the owners of the abutting land, each abutting owner taking to the center of the roadway, except as provided in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (1). In the event that the boundary lines of abutting lands do not intersect said roadway at a right angle, the land included within such roadway shall vest as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (1).

In all instances not specifically provided for, title to the vacated roadway shall vest in the owners of the abutting land, each abutting owner taking that portion of the vacated roadway to which his land, or any part thereof, is nearest in proximity.

No portion of a roadway upon vacation shall accrue to an abutting roadway.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection (1), a board of county commissioners may provide that title to the vacated roadway shall vest, subject to a public-access easement or private-access easement to benefit designated properties, in the owner of the land abutting the vacated roadway, in other owners of land who use the vacated roadway as access to the owners' land, or in a legal entity that represents any owners of land who use the vacated roadway as access to the owners' land. Title shall vest to the owner of the land abutting the vacated roadway as otherwise required by paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection (1), unless the board expressly requires the title to vest pursuant to the authority set forth in this paragraph (f) in the resolution to vacate the roadway that is approved by the board.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 620, § 2.

CSA:

C. 143, § 69(2).

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-14-2.

L. 96:

IP(1) amended, p. 1456, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(f) added, p. 591, § 1, effective September 1.

43-2-303. Methods of vacation.

All right, title, or interest of a county, of an incorporated town or city, or of the state or of any of its political subdivisions in and to any roadway shall be divested upon vacation of such roadway by any of the following methods:

The city council or other similar authority of a city or town by ordinance may vacate any roadway or part thereof located within the corporate limits of said city or town, subject to the provisions of the charter of such municipal corporation and the constitution and statutes of the state of Colorado.

The board of county commissioners of any county may vacate any roadway or any part thereof located entirely within said county if such roadway is not within the limits of any city or town.

If such roadway constitutes the boundary line between two counties, such roadway or any part thereof may be vacated only by the joint action of the boards of county commissioners of both counties.

If said roadway constitutes the boundary line of a city or town, it may be vacated only by joint action of the board of county commissioners of the county and the duly constituted authority of the city or town.

No platted or deeded roadway or part thereof or unplatted or undefined roadway which exists by right of usage shall be vacated so as to leave any land adjoining said roadway without an established public road or private-access easement connecting said land with another established public road.

If any roadway has been established as a county road at any time, such roadway shall not be vacated by any method other than a resolution approved by the board of county commissioners of the county. No later than ten days prior to any county commissioner meeting at which a resolution to vacate a county roadway is to be presented, the county commissioners shall mail a notice by first-class mail to the last-known address of each landowner who owns one acre or more of land adjacent to the roadway. Such notice shall indicate the time and place of the county commissioner meeting and shall indicate that a resolution to vacate the county roadway will be presented at the meeting.

If any roadway has been established as a municipal street at any time, such street shall not be vacated by any method other than an ordinance approved by the governing body of the municipality.

If any roadway has been established as a state highway, such roadway shall not be vacated or abandoned by any method other than a resolution approved by the transportation commission pursuant to section 43-1-106 (11).

Paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection (2) shall not apply to any roadway that has been established but has not been used as a roadway after such establishment.

If any roadway is vacated or abandoned, the documents vacating or abandoning such roadway shall be recorded pursuant to the requirements of section 43-1-202.7.

In the event of vacation under subsection (1) of this section, rights-of-way or easements may be reserved for the continued use of existing sewer, gas, water, or similar pipelines and appurtenances, for ditches or canals and appurtenances, and for electric, telephone, and similar lines and appurtenances.

Any written instrument of vacation or a resubdivision plat purporting to vacate or relocate roadways or portions thereof which remains of record in the counties where the roadways affected are situated for a period of seven years shall be prima facie evidence of an effective vacation of such former roadways. This subsection (4) shall not apply during the pendency of an action commenced prior to the expiration of said seven-year period to set aside, modify, or annul the vacation or when the vacation has been set aside, modified, or annulled by proper order or decree of a competent court and such notice of pendency of action or a certified copy of such decree has been recorded in the recorder's office of the county where the property is located.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 621, § 3.

CSA:

C. 143, § 69(3).

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-14-3.

L. 88:

(2) amended, p. 1122, § 2, effective April 20.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 615, § 2, effective April 30.

43-2-304. Limitation of actions.

Any limitation established by this part 3 shall apply to causes of action which have accrued prior to May 5, 1949, as well as to all causes of action accruing thereafter. The right to institute an action shall not be barred by reason of the limitations prescribed in said part 3 until the expiration of six months from May 5, 1949. This part 3 shall not be construed as reviving any action or limitation barred by any former or other statute.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 622, § 4.

CSA:

C. 143, § 69(4).

CRS 53:

§ 120-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-14-4.